South Dakota, session 2026, SB124.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 34-18:
During the period beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2031, a person may
not sell, offer for sale, hold for sale, or distribute in this state any product containing cell-
cultured protein.
Upon receipt of a complaint, the department must inspect any food service
establishment, mobile food service establishment, or temporary food service
establishment and, if a violation is found, issue a stop-sale order. Following a conviction
under this section, the department must proceed in accordance with chapter 1-26 to
suspend, revoke, or deny renewal of the establishment’s license, as provided under §§ 34-
18-27.1 and 34-18-27.3.
A violation of this section is a Class 2 misdemeanor.
For purposes of this section, "cell-cultured protein" means a product that is
produced for use as human food, made wholly or in part from any cell culture or DNA of
a host animal, and grown or cultivated outside a live animal. Cell-cultured protein does
not include proteins produced through microbial fermentation, enzymatic processing,
traditional food cultures, or biotechnology processes used in the manufacturing of
pharmaceuticals, biologics, vaccines, dietary supplements, enzymes, or medical products,
provided those products are not intended to replicate meat or animal tissue for human
consumption.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 39-5:

26.811.12 2 124
During the period beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2031, a person may
not sell, manufacture, offer for sale, hold for sale, or distribute in this state any product
containing cell-cultured protein.
The Animal Industry Board shall enforce this section using its existing authority,
including by seizure and condemnation of products, as provided in § 39-5-38.
A violation of this section is a Class 2 misdemeanor
For purposes of this section, "cell-cultured protein" means a product that is
produced for use as human food, made wholly or in part from any cell culture or DNA of
a host animal, and grown or cultivated outside a live animal. Cell-cultured protein does
not include proteins produced through microbial fermentation, enzymatic processing,
traditional food cultures, or biotechnology processes used in the manufacture of
pharmaceuticals, biologics, vaccines, dietary supplements, enzymes, or medical products,
provided those products are not intended to replicate meat or animal tissue for human
consumption.
SB124 ENROLLED

26.811.12 3 124
An Act to temporarily prohibit the manufacture, sale, and distribution of any product
containing cell-cultured protein, and to provide a penalty therefor.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 124
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 124 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB124 ENROLLED